Wyoming statutes. Title 13 Banks, Banking and Finance
Article 2. Applicability

§ 13-1-201.
General applicability.

Subject to W.S. 13-12-202, this act applies to all banks in this state organized under this act and to national banks where specifically provided by the text.

The Financial Technology Sandbox Act shall apply to this act.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 157, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 10-101; C.S. 1945, § 35-101; W.S. 1957, § 13-4; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 2019 ch. 61, § 3, effective January 1, 2020; 2019 ch. 92, § 3, effective October 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendments. —

The first 2019 amendment, by ch. 61, § 3, effective January 1, 2020, designated former undesignated paragraph as present (a); and added (b).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “[t]his act,” referred to in this section, see § 13-1-101(a)(xiv).

§ 13-1-202.
Foreign corporations.

A foreign corporation does not transact banking business in Wyoming by reason of the following activities:

Purchasing evidences of debt, mortgages or liens on property;

Securing or collecting debts or enforcing any rights in property securing the debts.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 133, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 13-43.1; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 13-1-203.
Compliance required.

No person or entity shall carry on a banking business except in compliance with this act or W.S.

13-12-101

through

13-12-126

.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 157, § 11; R.S. 1931, § 10-111; C.S. 1945, § 35-112; W.S. 1957, § 13-10; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1987, ch. 172, § 2; 2019 ch. 92, § 3, effective October 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective October 1, 2019, added “or W.S.

13-12-101

through

13-12-126

.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 13-1-101(a)(xiv).

§ 13-1-204.
Use of terms or names.

No person or entity shall advertise, issue or circulate any paper or exhibit any sign using any of the terms “bank”, “banker”, “banking”, “special purpose depository institution”, or words of similar import, or use the name of any other financial institution as defined by W.S. 13-1-101(a)(ix) until they have fully complied with this act or W.S.

13-12-101

through

13-12-126

.

Consistent with subsection (a) of this section, a special purpose depository institution may refer to itself as a bank.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 157, § 11; R.S. 1931, § 10-111; C.S. 1945, § 35-112; W.S. 1957, § 13-10; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1988, ch. 59, § 1; 1993, ch. 115, § 1; 2019 ch. 92, § 3, effective October 1, 2019.

The 2019 amendment,

effective October 1, 2019, designated former undesignated paragraph as present (a), and added “ ‘special purpose depository institution’,” and “or W.S.

13-12-101

through

13-12-126

”; and added (b).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 13-1-101(a)(xiv).

§ 13-1-205.
Financial institutions; consumer reports; encumbrance of assets; immunity.

Any financial institution as defined in W.S. 13-1-101(a)(ix), national chartered credit union, benefit association, insurance company, safe deposit company, money market mutual fund or similar entity authorized to do business in the state shall:

Enter into an agreement with the department of family services to provide identifying information for each noncustodial parent who maintains an account at the institution and who the department of family services identifies as owing past due child support, provided:

Any financial institution entering into agreement with the department pursuant to this section shall be entitled to recover its reasonable and necessary charges for researching or providing information pursuant to a request;

Each financial institution shall have an agreement with the department setting a time schedule for developing an agreement for providing the information required pursuant to this section.

In response to a notice of lien or levy, encumber and, pursuant to court order, surrender assets of a noncustodial parent who is identified by the department of family services as owing past due child support which are maintained at the financial institution or national chartered credit union in a demand deposit account, checking or other negotiable withdrawal order account, savings or share account, time deposit account or money market mutual fund account. Any assets in an account protected under the federal Employee Retirement Income Security Act shall be subject to a lien under this section, but shall not be surrendered by the financial institution or national chartered credit union.

Any financial institution as defined in W.S. 13-1-101(a)(ix), national chartered credit union, benefit association, insurance company, safe deposit company, money market mutual fund or similar entity authorized to do business in the state shall not be liable to any person for:

Any disclosure of information provided to the department of family services under this section;

Encumbering pursuant to notice from the department, or surrendering pursuant to court order, any assets held by the institution or credit union in response to a notice of lien or levy issued by the department of family services; or

Any other action taken in good faith to comply with the provisions of this section.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 193, § 1; 2010, ch. 69, § 203.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (a)(i)(B), deleted “By July 1, 1997” at the beginning, and deleted the former last sentence, which read: “The agreements shall be completed by January 1, 1998, and shall go into effect no later March 31, 1998.”